North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153A. Counties.
Article 18. Planning and Regulation of Development.

§§ 153A-320 through 153A-378.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by Session Laws 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and Session Laws 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020.

History.

G.S. 153A-320

; 1959, c. 1006, s. 1; c. 1007; 1965, c. 194, s. 2; c. 195; 1969, c. 1066, s. 1; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 2011-326, s. 9; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020.

G.S. 153A-320

.1; 2014-120, s. 16(b); 2019-111, s. 1.2(b); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-321; 1945, c. 1040, s. 1; 1955, c. 1252; 1957, c. 947; 1959, c. 327, s. 1; c. 390; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1979, c. 611, s. 6; 1997-309, s. 5; 2004-199, s. 41(c); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-322; 1945, c. 1040, s. 1; 1955, c. 1252; 1957, c. 947; 1959, c. 327, s. 1; c. 390; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1983, c. 377, s. 8; 2004-199, s. 41(d); 2005-418, s. 1(b); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-323; 1959, c. 1006, s. 1; c. 1007; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1981, c. 891, ss. 2, 9; 2004-75, s. 1; 2005-426, s. 1(b); 2013-59, s. 1; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-324; 1959, c. 1006, s. 1; 1961, c. 414; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 2007-371, s. 1; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-325; 1983, c. 614, s. 4; 1987, c. 45, s. 1; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-326; 1987, c. 747, s. 15; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-330; 1959, c. 1007; 1965, c. 195; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 2005-418, s. 2(b); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-331; 1959, c. 1007; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1975, c. 231; 1987, c. 747, ss. 10, 17; 2005-426, s. 2(b); 2015-187, s. 1(b); 2019-79, s. 2; 2019-174, s. 3(c); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-332; 1959, c. 1007; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1997-309, s. 6; 2005-418, s. 3(b); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-333; 1959, c. 1007; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-334; 1959, c. 1007; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1977, c. 820, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 1063; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2005-426, s. 3(b); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-335; 1959, c. 1007; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1979, c. 611, s. 2; 2003-284, s. 29.23(b); 2005-426, s. 4(b); 2017-10, s. 2.5(a); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-336; 2009-421, s. 2(b); 2013-126, s. 7; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-340; 1959, c. 1006, s. 1; 1967, c. 1208, s. 4; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1981, c. 891, s. 6; 1983, c. 441; 1985, c. 442, s. 2; 1987, c. 747, s. 12; 1991, c. 69, s. 1; 1997-458, s. 2.1; 2005-390, s. 6; 2005-426, s. 5(b); 2006-259, s. 26(a); 2007-381, s. 1; 2011-286, s. 1; 2011-363, s. 1; 2011-384, s. 5; 2013-126, ss. 5, 8; 2013-347, s. 1; 2013-413, s. 6(a); 2015-86, s. 2; 2015-246, ss. 3.1(b), 4(a); 2015-286, s. 1.8(b); 2017-102, s. 29; 2017-108, ss. 8(a), 9(a); 2019-111, s. 1.13; 2019-174, s. 3(d); 2020-18, s. 5(b); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-341; 1959, c. 1006, s. 1; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 2005-426, s. 7(b); 2017-10, s. 2.4(a); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-341.1; 1987, c. 805, s. 2; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-341.2; 2007-147, s. 2; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-341.3; 2014-94, s. 1; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-342; 1959, c. 1006, s. 1; 1965, c. 194, s. 2; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1985, c. 607, s. 3; 2005-426, s. 6(b); 2019-111, s. 1.15; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-343; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1985, c. 595, s. 1; 1987, c. 807, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 980, s. 2; 1993, c. 469, s. 2; 1995, c. 261, s. 1; c. 546, s. 2; 1997-456, s. 25; 2005-418, s. 4(b); 2009-178, s. 1; 2019-111, s. 1.5; repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-344; 1959, c. 1006, s. 1; 1965, c. 194, s. 3; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1979, c. 611, s. 3; 1985, c. 540, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 996, s. 5; 2005-418, s. 7(b); 2016-111, s. 3; 2019-111, s. 1.3(d), (e); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020. G.S. 153A-344.1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 996, s. 6; 2016-111, s. 4; 2019-111, s. 1.3(f); repealed by 2019-111, s. 2.2, as amended by 2020-3, s. 4.33(a), and 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d), effective June 19, 2020.

Cross References.

As to present similar provisions pertaining to Local Planning and Development Regulation, see Chapter 160D, G.S. 160D-101 et seq.

§§ 153A-379 through 153A-390.

Reserved for future codification purposes.